Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1902
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 69-1901 to 69-1904:

(1) Distribute shall mean to give smokeless tobacco products to the general public at no cost or at nominal cost or to give coupons or rebate offers with the products; and

(2) Smokeless tobacco product shall mean (a) loose tobacco or a flat compressed cake of tobacco that may be chewed or held in the mouth or (b) a small amount of shredded, powdered, or pulverized tobacco that may be inhaled through the nostrils, chewed, or held in the mouth.

Laws 1989, LB 48, § 2.